dictionaries/ro-ro.dic
abrazez/B
abstrag/EH
abÈ›in/EH
acaparez/B
acidulez/B
acomodez/B
activez/B
adaptez/B
administrez/B
admit/EH
aduc/EH
adverbializez/B
afiÈ™ez/B
agravez/B
aiurez/B
ajung/EH
alcoolizez/B
aleg/EH
aliniez/B
alÄƒturez/B
ambreiez/B
amnistiez/B
anagramatizez/B
anchilozez/B
angajez/B
antagonizez/B
antepun/EH
antrenez/B
aparÈ›in/EH
apologizez/B
aprind/EH
aproximez/B
apun/EH
ard/EH
arestez/B
aristocratizez/B
articulez/B
ascund/EH
asediez/B
asimilez/B
atenuez/B
ating/EH
atrag/EH
augmentez/B
autoaprovizionez/B
autodistrug/EH
autoelogiez/B
autoignorez/B
autopersiflez/B
autoutilez/B
avizajez/B
aÈ™tern/EH
bagatelizez/B
balonez/B
barbotez/B
beneficiez/B
bisez/B
blazonez/B
bombez/B
boxez/B
briez/B
brutalizez/B
bursuchez/B
cadastrez/B
calculez/B
calvinizez/B
canonizez/B
capotez/B
carbonez/B
cartez/B
catapultez/B
cauzez/B
centrez/B
cern/EH
cesionez/B
cibernetizez/B
cinez/B
clasez/B
cloroformizez/B
cochetez/B
cointeresez/B
colmatez/B
comercializez/B
comit/EH
complementarizez/B
compulsez/B
compun/EH
concep/EH
conceptualizez/B
condimentez/B
conduc/EH
conferenÈ›iez/B
conglutinez/B
consolez/B
constrÃ¢ng/EH
contaminez/B
contracarez/B
contrapun/EH
contrazic/EH
controlez/B
converg/EH
conving/EH
conÈ™tientizez/B
conÈ›in/EH
corectez/B
corespund/EH
cortez/B
cravaÈ™ez/B
cretinizez/B
croÈ™etez/B
culeg/EH
culminez/B
cuprez/B
cuprind/EH
curg/EH
cÃ¢rlionÈ›ez/B
dactilografiez/B
datorez/B
debleiez/B
deburez/B
decalaminez/B
decapsulez/B
decerebrez/B
decid/EH
declorizez/B
decolorez/B
deconectez/B
decopertez/B
decroÈ™ez/B
decurg/EH
deduc/EH
defalchez/B
defetiÈ™izez/B
defosforez/B
degenerez/B
degrevez/B
dejughez/B
delimitez/B
demasculinizez/B
demit/EH
demitologizez/B
demonizez/B
denaturez/B
denotez/B
depavez/B
depind/EH
depliez/B
deplÃ¢ng/EH
depopulez/B
deprind/EH
depun/EH
depunctez/B
derobez/B
descentralizez/B
deschid/EH
descind/EH
descing/E
descompun/EH
descongestionez/B
desemnez/B
desfrÃ¢nez/B
desistez/B
desprind/EH
desregimentez/B
desulfitez/B
detectez/B
devalizez/B
devitalizez/B
dezafectez/B
dezangrenez/B
dezavantajez/B
dezemulsionez/B
dezic/EH
dezindividualizez/B
dezinteresez/B
dezorganizez/B
deÈ™euez/B
deÈ›in/EH
diazotez/B
digitalizez/B
dinÈ›ez/B
discern/EH
disertez/B
disjung/E
dispun/EH
disting/EH
distrag/EH
distrug/EH
divorÈ›ez/B
dreg/EH
drenez/B
duc/EH
ecarisez/B
edictez/B
electrocauterizez/B
emasculez/B
emerg/EH
emit/EH
epurez/B
esenÈ›ializez/B
etichetez/B
evidenÈ›iez/B
excerptez/B
exclud/EH
expandez/B
expun/EH
exsudez/B
eÈ™antionez/B
fartez/B
fezandez/B
fierb/EH
finanÈ›ez/B
flauÈ™ez/B
forez/B
francizez/B
frig/EH
frÃ¢ng/EH
fug/E
fulminez/B
gambiez/B
gesticulez/B
godronez/B
greblez/B
gudronez/B
haÈ™urez/B
hispanizez/B
ilegalizez/B
impestez/B
impun/EH
incendiez/B
includ/EH
indispun/EH
individualizez/B
induc/EH
inflig/E
inhalez/B
insonorizez/B
interconectez/B
interpun/EH
interzic/EH
intitulez/B
introduc/EH
ionizez/B
jonglez/B
juxtapun/EH
lapidez/B
libelez/B
ling/EH
listez/B
loÈ›ionez/B
magnetizez/B
maniez/B
maruflez/B
maturez/B
melaminez/B
menÈ›in/EH
merg/E
metabolizez/B
migrez/B
mitizez/B
moderez/B
monologhez/B
moÈ›ez/B
mulg/EH
narez/B
neurastenizez/B
ning/EH
nuanÈ›ez/B
obÈ›in/EH
ocazionez/B
omit/EH
opalizez/B
opun/EH
orizontalizez/B
padelez/B
paradez/B
parcurg/EH
parez/B
pasteurizez/B
pecarizez/B
percep/EH
percutez/B
peripatetizez/B
permit/EH
petrec/EH
petrolizez/B
piruetez/B
plasez/B
plÃ¢ng/EH
poetizez/B
popistrez/B
pozitivizez/B
predispun/EH
prejudiciez/B
preling/EH
presez/B
presupun/EH
pretind/EH
prezic/EH
pricep/EH
prind/EH
privez/B
produc/EH
prognozez/B
promit/EH
propun/EH
protezez/B
pun/EH
punctez/B
pÄƒtrund/EH
radiobalizez/B
rag/EH
randomizez/B
raÈ›ionez/B
recepÈ›ionez/B
redactez/B
regentez/B
reinventez/B
renegociez/B
repez/B
resping/EH
restructurez/B
revanÈ™ez/B
reÃ®nscÄƒunez/B
ripostez/B
rubrichez/B
rup/EH
rÃ¢d/EH
rÄƒmÃ¢n/E
rÄƒpun/EH
rÄƒsfrÃ¢ng/EH
rÄƒspund/EH
rÄƒsÃ®nÈ›eleg/EH
rÄƒÈ™chirez/B
sanitizez/B
schematizez/B
scot/EH
scurg/EH
scÄƒlÄƒmbÄƒiez/B
seduc/EH
semaforizez/B
sesizez/B
simetrizez/B
sintonizez/B
smulg/EH
solidarizez/B
spaÈ›iez/B
spun/EH
stampilez/B
stilez/B
structurez/B
strÃ¢ng/EH
strÄƒpung/EH
subintitulez/B
subjug/EH
sudez/B
sug/EH
supez/B
suprapopulez/B
supraproduc/EH
suprapun/EH
supun/EH
suspendez/B
sustrag/EH
susÈ›in/EH
tachinez/B
tapotez/B
teleecranizez/B
teoretizez/B
timbrez/B
tonsurez/B
traduc/EH
trag/EH
transbordez/B
transmit/EH
transpun/EH
tranzitez/B
trec/EH
triez/B
trimit/EH
tubez/B
ulcerez/B
ung/EH
urgentez/B
valsez/B
vernisez/B
vitriolez/B
vulgarizez/B
zic/EH
zincografiez/B
Ã®mbÄƒlsÄƒmez/B
Ã®mping/EH
Ã®mpovÄƒrez/B
Ã®mpung/EH
Ã®naripez/B
Ã®ncep/EH
Ã®nchid/EH
Ã®ncing/EH
Ã®nciudez/B
Ã®ncredinÈ›ez/B
Ã®ncÃ¢rlighez/B
Ã®ndoctrinez/B
Ã®nfig/EH
Ã®nfiripez/B
Ã®nfrÃ¢ng/EH
Ã®nglobez/B
Ã®nlÄƒcrimez/B
Ã®nrÄƒmez/B
Ã®nstrunez/B
Ã®ntind/EH
Ã®nting/EH
Ã®ntrebuinÈ›ez/B
Ã®ntrec/EH
Ã®ntrerup/EH
Ã®ntreÈ›in/EH
Ã®nving/EH
Ã®nvoioÈ™ez/B
Ã®nÈ›eleg/EH
È™ablonez/B
È™ifonez/B
È™terg/EH
È›es/EH
È›in/EH
